Illinois, session 104th, HB4331.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 5Practices Act is amended by adding Section 2MMMM as follows: 6    (815 ILCS 505/2MMMM new)7    Sec. 2MMMM. Telehealth billing transparency.8    (a) For the purpose of this Section, "facility", "health 9care professional", and "telehealth services" have the 10meanings set forth in Section 5 of the Telehealth Act.11    (b) A facility or health care professional that offers 12telehealth services shall not bill or charge a person, group 13or individual policy of accident and health insurance, or 14managed care plan for any services or care not rendered during 15a telehealth visit, including, but not limited to, exams that 16are not possible to perform on a patient at a remote location, 17such as taking measurements of a patient's blood pressure, 18temperature, height, or weight.19    (c) A violation of this Section is an unlawful practice 20within the meaning of this Act.